District of Columbia statutes.
20-752

Expenses of estate litigation.

Without regard to the provisions of section 20-751 , when a personal representative or a person nominated as personal representative defends or prosecutes in good faith and with just cause any proceeding relating to the decedent’s estate, whether successful or not, such personal representative shall be entitled to receive from the estate any necessary expenses and disbursements relating to such proceeding.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

History

1981 Ed., § 20-752.

Prior Codifications